Massachusetts, session 194th, H3165.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 3 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is 
hereby amended by inserting after the word “wife.”, in line 111, the following words:- Said 
deduction shall be available to a resident shareholder of a housing cooperative organized under 
chapter 156B or chapter 157 who has resided in his or her cooperative unit throughout the tax 
year and has not claimed a deduction for real estate taxes  or mortgage interest on the resident 
shareholder’s federal income tax return.